Illinois, session 104th, HB2612.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Construction Zone Safe Detour Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "GPS service provider" means an entity that provides its 8users with positioning, navigation, and timing services.9    "Primary highway" has the meaning given to that term under 10the Highway Advertising Control Act of 1971. 11    "Secondary route" means a highway which serves traffic 12between urban and rural districts and provides traffic 13connections between primary highways or roads. 14    Section 10. GPS service providers; damages. A company that 15provides global positioning system (GPS) travel services in 16this State is required to ensure that at least one person is 17available to receive official requests 24 hours per day, 7 18days per week from emergency services, Illinois State Police, 19or the Department of Transportation for the purpose of 20implementing proper detours in the event of construction or 21emergency. The GPS service provider shall upload the detour 22and routing information provided by emergency services,   HB2612- 2 -LRB104 10802 LNS 20883 b1Illinois State Police, or the Department of Transportation 2into its navigation system to properly route users of the GPS 3service provider's systems. 4    A GPS service provider that fails to implement proper 5detour routing, on both an ongoing and emergency basis, may be 6liable for treble damages under Section 2-1115.05 of the Code 7of Civil Procedure.8    It shall be an affirmative defense for GPS service 9providers if emergency services, including the Department of 10Transportation and Illinois State Police, fail to notify the 11GPS service provider with routing information.  12    Section 15. Construction on primary and secondary routes. 13The Department of Transportation shall not conduct 14construction on a secondary route or parallel primary highway 15at the same time, except in an emergency. 16    Section 20. Reimbursement to local governments. The 17Department shall reimburse local governments for damages 18caused to roads within the local government's jurisdiction 19that arise from any detour around or near a construction zone 20authorized by the Department. 21    Section 25. Emergency rulemaking. The Department shall 22adopt emergency rules to administer this Section in accordance 23with Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   HB2612- 3 -LRB104 10802 LNS 20883 b1Act. For the purposes of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 2Act, the General Assembly finds that the adoption of rules to 3implement this Section is deemed an emergency and necessary to 4the interest, safety, and welfare of the public.